en: skimmed, skim, non-fat, nonfat, fat-free, low-fat, lowfat, defatted, 1% fat, with 0.5% milk fat
ar: منزوع الدسم
bg: обезмаслено, обезмаслно, обезмаслен, обезмаслена, обезмаслени
ca: desnatada, descremada, desgreixat, desgreixada, desgreixats, desgreixades, sense greix, baixa en greixos
cs: odstředěné, odstředěné
de: Mager, entrahmtes, entrahmte, entfettet, entfettete, entfetteter, entfettetes, entfetteten, entfettetem, fettarme
el: αποβουτυρωμένο
es: desnatada, descremada, desengrasado, desengrasada, desgrasado, desgrasada, sin grasas, baja en grasa
et: koorimata, kooritud
fa: خشک بدون چربی
fi: rasvaton, rasvatonta, Vähärasvainen
fr: écrémé, maigre, dégraissé, dégraissée, dégraissés, dégraissées
gl: desnatado
he: רזה
hr: obrano, obrane, obrani
hu: sovány, zsírtalanított, fölözött, alacsony zsírtartalmú
id: skim
is: undanrennur
it: scremato, magro, sgrassato, sgrassata, senza grassi, magro
ja: 脱脂
lt: nugriebtas, nugriebto, lieso
lv: vaj, vāj
mk: обрано
ms: skim
nl: mager, magere, ontvet, ontvette, tapte, onder, afgeroomde, vetvrije
pl: odtłuszczone, chude, o obniżonej zawartości tłuszczu, odtłuszczony, odtłuszczona, odtłuszczonego
pt: magro, desnatado, desengordurado, desengordurada
ro: degresat
ru: обезжиренноё, и обезжиренноё, обезжиренный, обезжиренное, безжиренное, и обезжиренное
sk: odstredené
sl: posneto
sq: i skremuar
th: ขาดมันเนย
tr: yağsız, kaymağı alınmış
uk: знежирений, знежирене, знежирена, знежирені, без жиру, нежирний, нежирна, нежирне, нежирні
vi: gầy
zh: 脱脂

en: semi-skimmed, partially defatted, reduced-fat, partly skimmed, partially skimmed, part skim
bg: Полуобезмаслено, частично обезмаслен, частично обезмаслено
ca: parcialment desnatada, semidesnatada, parcialment desgreixat, parcialment desgreixada, parcialment desgreixats, parcialment desgreixades
de: teilentrahmte, teilentfettet, teilentfettete, teilentfettetes, teilentfetteter, teilentfetteten, teilentfettetem, halbentrahmte
es: parcialmente desnatada, semidesnatada, semidescremada, parcialmente descremada
fi: kevyt
fr: semi-écrémé, demi-écrémé, partiellement écrémé
hr: poluobrano, djelomično obrano, djelimično obrano
hu: zsírszegény, félzsíros
it: semi-magro, parzialmente scremato, semiscremato
nl: halfvolle, gedeeltelijk afgeroomde
pl: częściowo odtłuszczone, częściowo odtłuszczony, częściowo odtłuszczona, częściowo odtłuszczonego, półtłusty, półtłuste
pt: meio gordo, parcialmente desengordurado, parcialmente desengordurada, parcialmente desnatado
ro: demidegresat

en: frozen
ar: مجمد
bg: замразено, замразен, замразена, замразени
ca: congelat, congelades, ultracongelat, ultracongelades
da: frossen, frosne
de: tiefgefroren, gefroren, tiefgefrorene, gefrorene, tiefgefrorener, gefrorener, tiefgefrorenes, gefrorenes
el: παγωμένη
es: congelado, conjelada, congelados, conjeladas, ultracongelado, ultracongelada, ultracongelados, ultracongeladas
fi: pakaste
fr: surgelé, surgelée, surgelés, surgelées, congelé, congelée, congelés, congelées
hr: smrznuti, brzo smrznuti
hu: fagyasztott, fagyott
it: congelato, congelati, congelata, congelate, surgelato, surgelati, surgelata, surgelate
nb: frosne
nl: diepgevroren
pl: mrożony, mrożona, mrożone
pt: congelado, congelada, congelados, congeladas, ultracongelado, ultracongelada, ultracongelados, ultracongeladas
ro: congelat
sv: fryst, frossad
uk: морожений, морожена, морожене, морожені, заморожене, заморожена, заморожений, заморожені

en: deep frozen
da: dybfrossen, dybfrosne
nb: dybfryst
sv: djupfryst, djupfrysta
uk: глибокої заморозки

en: frozen in pieces
da: løsfrossen, løsfrosne
fi: irtopakastettu
nb: løsfryste
sv: styckfryst, styckfrysta

en: unfrozen
bg: размразено, размразен, размразена, размразени
ca: descongelat, descongelada, descongelades
da: ufrosne
de: ungefroren, ungefrorene, ungefrorener, ungefrorenes
es: descongelado, descongelada, descongelados, descongeladas
fi: pakastetut
fr: décongelé, décongelée, décongelés, décongelées
hu: felolvasztott, kiolvasztott
it: decongelato, decongelata, decongelati, decongelate
nb: ufrosne
nl: ontdooid
pt: descongelado, descongelada, descongelados, descongeladas
sv: ofryst, ofrysta, ofrossad, ofrossade
uk: розморожений, розморожена, розморожене, розморожені

en: sterilized, sterilised
bg: стерилизирано, стерилизиран, стерилизирана, стерилизирани
ca: esterilitzat, esterilitzada
da: steriliseret, steriliserede
de: sterilisiert, sterilisierte, sterilisierter, sterilisiertes, sterilisierten, sterilisiertem
es: esterilizado, esterilizada, esterilizados, esterilizadas
fi: steriloitu
fr: stérilisé, stérilisée, stérilisés, stérilisées
hr: sterilizirano
hu: hőkezelt, sterilizált
it: sterilizzato, sterilizzata, sterilizzati, sterilizzate
lt: sterilizuotas
nl: gesteriliseerd, gesteriliseerde
pl: sterylizowane
pt: esterilizado, esterilizada, esterilizados, esterilizadas
sv: steriliserad, steriliserat, steriliserade
uk: стерилізований, стерилізована, стерилізоване, стерилізовані

en: pasteurised, pasteurized
bg: пастьоризиран, пастьоризирана, пастьоризирано, пастьоризирани
ca: pasteuritzada, pasteuritada, pasteuritzat, pasteuritzats
cs: pasterizované
da: pasteuriseret, pasteuriserede
de: pasteurisiert, pasteurisierte, pasteurisierter, pasteurisiertes
es: pasteurizado, pasteurizada, pasteurizados, pasteurizadas, producto pasteurizado, producto pasteurizada, pasterizada
et: pastöriseeritud
fi: pastöroitu, pastöroidusta
fr: pasteurisé, pasteurisée, pasteurisés, pasteurisées, et pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirano, pasterizirana, pasterizirani
hu: pasztőrözött, pasztörizált, pasztörizál
it: pastorizzato, pastorizzata, pastorizzate, pastorizzati
ja: パスチャライズ
lt: pasterizuotas
lv: pasterizēts
nb: pasteurisert
nl: gepasteuriseerd, gepasteuriseerde
pl: pasteryzowana, pasteryzowane, pasteryzowany, pasteryzowanego, pasteryzowanej
pt: pasteurizado, pasteurizados, pasteurizada, pasteurizadas
ro: pasteurizat, pasteurizata, pasteurizate
ru: пастеризованные, Пастеризованное
sr: pasterizovana
sv: pastöriserad, pastöriserat, pastöriserade
tr: pastörize
uk: пастеризований, пастеризована, пастеризоване, пастеризовані

en: low-pasteurized, low-pasteurised
sv: lågpastöriserad, lågpastöriserat, lågpastöriserade

en: high-pasteurized, high-pasteurised
sv: högpastöriserad, högpastöriserat, högpastöriserade

en: UHT, UHT pasteurised, UHT pasteurized, UHT sterilised, UHT sterilized, ultra heat treated
xx: UHT
bg: UHT, UHT пастьоризирано, обработена с изключително висока температура
ca: UHT, esterilitzada UHT
de: UHT, H-, Haltbar, Haltbare
es: UHT, esterelizada UHT, esterilizada UHT
fi: UHT, iskukuumennettu, UHT-käsitelty
fr: UHT, stérilisé U.H.T, stérilisé u h t, stérilisé uht, pasteurisation haute
hr: UHT, uht pasterizirano, uht sterilizirano, trajno
hu: UHT, pasztőrözött UHT
it: UHT, pastorizzato UHT, UHT sterilizzato, uht verhit
nl: UHT, UHT-gesteriliseerde
sv: UHT, UHT-behandlad

en: thermised, thermized, thermalised, thermalized
ca: termitzada
de: thermisiert
es: termizada
fr: thermisé
it: termizzato
nl: thermisch behandeld, gestremde
pt: termizado

en: heat treated
da: varmebehandlet
de: wärmebehandelt
fr: traitement thermique
sv: värmebehandlad, värmebehandlat, värmebehandlade

en: unpasteurized, unpasteurised
bg: непастьоризиран, непастьоризирано, непастьоризирана
ca: sense pasteuritzar, no pasteuritzat, no pasteuritzats
es: sin pasteurizar, no pasteurizado, no pasteurizados
fr: non pasteurisé
pl: niepasteryzowana, niepasteryzowane, niepasteryzowany
pt: não pasteurizado, não pasteurizados, não pasteurizada, não pasteurizadas
sv: opastöriserad, opastöriserat, opastöriserade
tr: pastörize edilmemiş
uk: непастеризований, непастеризована, непастеризоване, непастеризовані

en: pre-cooked, precooked
ca: precuit
da: forkogte
de: vorgekocht, vorgekochte, vorgekochter, vorgekochtes
es: precocido, precocida, precocidos, precocidas
fi: esikypsennetty, esikypsennetyt
fr: pré-cuit, pré-cuite, pré-cuits, pré-cuites, précuit, précuite, précuits, précuites
hu: előfőzött
it: precotto, precotta, precotti, precotte
nl: voorgekookt, voorgekookte
pl: wstępnie gotowany, wstępnie gotowana, wstępnie gotowane, wstępnie ugotowany, wstępnie ugotowana, wstępnie ugotowane
sv: förkokad, förkokat, förkokade, förkokt, förkokta
zh: 预煮

en: parboiled
de: parboiled
es: parboiled
fi: parboil-käsitelty
hr: parboiled
it: parboiled
pt: parboilizado, parboilizada, parboilizados, parboilizadas
sl: parboiled
sv: förvälld, förvällt, förvällda
uk: підварений, підварена, підварене, підварені

en: blanched
de: blanchiert, blanchierte, blanchierter, blanchiertes
fr: blanchi, blanchie, blanchis, blanchies
hu: blansírozott
it: sbollentato, sbollentata, sbollentati, sbollentate
nl: geblancheerd
pl: blanszowany, blanszowana, blanszowane, blanszowanych, blanszowanego, blanszowanej
ro: blanșați, blanșate
sv: blancherad, blancherat, blancherade
uk: бланшований, бланшована, бланшоване, бланшовані
zh: 焯水

en: thermally processed
hr: termički obrađena

en: cooked, boiled
ar: مطبوخ
bg: сготвено, сготвена, сготвен, сготвени, варено, варена, варен, варени
cs: vařená
da: kogte
de: gekocht, gekochte, gekochter, gekochtes
es: cocido, cocida, cocidos, cocidas
fi: paistettu, keitetty, keitetyt, kypsennetty, kypsennetyt
fr: cuit, cuite, cuits, cuites, cuit au naturel, cuite au naturel, cuits au naturel, cuites au naturel, cuisiné, cuisinée, cuisinés, cuisinées
hr: kuhani, kuhano, tostirano, termički obrađeno
hu: főtt, főzött
id: rebus
it: cotto, cotta, cotti, cotte, cotto al naturale, cotta al naturale, cotti al naturale, cotte al naturale, cucinato, cucinata, cucinati, cucinate
ja: ゆで, 茹で
ms: rebus
nb: kokt, kokte
nl: gekookt, gekookte
nn: kogte
pl: gotowana, gotowany, gotowane, gotowanej, gotowanego, gotowanych, ugotowana, ugotowany, ugotowane, ugotowanej, ugotowanego, ugotowanych
pt: cozido, cozida, cozidos, cozidas
ro: fiert
sv: kokt, kokta
uk: відварений, відварена, відварене, відварені, варений, варена, варене, варені
zh: 熟制

en: distilled
bg: дестилация, дестилиран
de: destilliert, destillierte, destillierter, destilliertes
es: destilado, destilada, destilados, destiladas
fr: distillé, distillée, distillés, distillées
hr: destilat, destilirano, destilirana, destilirano, destilirani
it: distillato, distillata, distillati, distillate
nl: gedestilleerd, gedestilleerde
pl: destylowany, destylowana, destylowane, destylowanych, destylowanego, destylowanej
pt: destilado, destilada, destilados, destiladas
sv: destillerad, destillerat, destillerade
uk: дистильований, дистильована, дистильоване, дистильовані
zh: 蒸馏